Vermont, session 2025-2026, H198.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 App. V.S.A. § 1-2 is amended to read:
§ 1-2. BOARD OF TRUSTEES; MEMBERSHIP, TERMS OF SERVICE;
PRESIDING CHAIR
The Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural
College shall be composed of 25 27 members, whose term of office shall be six
years, except as to those who are members ex officio and to those who are
faculty and student members. Three members shall be appointed by the
Governor with the consent of the Senate. During the legislative session of
1955, the Governor shall appoint one member for a term of two years, one
member for a term of four years, and one member for a term of six years and it
shall be the duty of the Governor during the session of the Legislature prior to
expiration of the term of office of any of the members to appoint for the term
of six years a successor to the member whose term is expiring. The terms of
office of the Trustees trustees shall expire on the last day of February in the
respective years of expiration, and the terms of office of their successors shall
thereafter begin on March 1 and expire on the last day of February.
Nine members shall be those who have been heretofore elected by the
Legislature as members of the Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont
and State Agricultural College, and whose terms have not expired, and their
successors, and it shall be the duty of the Legislature at its session during
VT LEG #379084 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.198
2025 Page 3 of 6
which the terms of office of any class of the members expire to elect three
successor members for terms of six years. The terms shall commence on
March 1 in the year of election. The nine Trustees trustees and their successors
shall also constitute the Board of Trustees of the Vermont Agricultural
College.
Nine members shall be those who have been heretofore elected on behalf of
the University of Vermont as members of the Board of Trustees of the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College and whose terms have
not expired, and their successors, and it shall be the duty of said nine Trustees
trustees to elect successors to fill vacancies occurring among their number
upon expiration of the terms of office of any of them or otherwise. The nine
Trustees trustees and their successors shall also constitute the Board of
Trustees of the University of Vermont.
One member shall be a member of the University of Vermont and State
Agricultural College faculty, elected by the faculty in an election conducted by
the Faculty Senate, to serve a four-year term commencing on March 1 in the
year of election. The faculty member shall have full voting rights. A vacancy
for any cause shall be filled by a vote of the faculty and the term of the person
so appointed to fill the vacancy shall expire on the next following last day of
February.
VT LEG #379084 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.198
2025 Page 4 of 6
One member shall be a member of the University of Vermont and State
Agricultural College staff, appointed through a process ensuring broad
representation and alignment with the governance standards set for faculty
appointees.
Two members shall be students enrolled at the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College. One student member shall be a full-time
undergraduate student and one student member shall be a full-time graduate
student. Their terms of office shall be two years. Prior to February 1, 1978,
the Associated Directors for the Appointment of the University of Vermont
and State Agricultural College Student Trustees, Incorporated shall select and
appoint one student for a term of one year and one student for a term of two
years, both of whom shall be enrolled as full-time undergraduate or full-time
graduate students. Annually thereafter, the Directors shall meet to select and
appoint one student trustee for a term of two years in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The Directors shall fill any vacancy occurring
among the student trustee members upon the expiration of the term of office of
any of them or otherwise. A student shall be eligible to serve as a Trustee
trustee, provided the student is a full-time undergraduate or full-time graduate
student matriculating in accordance with the degree qualifications and
requirements established by the University of Vermont and State Agricultural
College and if the student remains in that status throughout the length of the
VT LEG #379084 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.198
2025 Page 5 of 6
term of office. The term of office of a Student Trustee student trustee shall
begin on March 1 following the date of appointment, and the term of office
shall end the last day of February in the year of expiration. Any student
elected hereunder shall have reached the age of 18 years of age.
All Trustees trustees so appointed and elected as hereinbefore provided,
shall, together with his or her Excellency, the Governor of the State, and the
President, who shall be, ex officio, a member, constitute an entire Board of
Trustees of the corporation known as the University of Vermont and State
Agricultural College, who shall have the entire management and control of its
property and affairs, and in all things relating thereto, except in the elections to
fill vacancies, as aforesaid, shall act together jointly, as one entire Board of
Trustees;, provided, that all future elections or appointments to the Board of
Trustees shall be made with special reference to preventing any religious
denominational preponderance in the Board. The Board shall annually, at its
first regular meeting after the election of new trustees, elect one of its members
to serve as Chair.
Sec. 2. TRANSITION
(a) On or before July 31, 2025, new faculty and staff members of the Board
of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall
be elected or appointed, as applicable, under Sec. 1 of this act.
VT LEG #379084 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.198
2025 Page 6 of 6
(b) The first year of service of these new members shall be a partial year
commencing on August 1, 2025 and ending on the last day of February 2026.
The remaining three years of each member’s term shall each be a full year.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379084 v.2